Utah statutes.
10-1-303.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Commission" means the State Tax Commission.
(2)  "Contractual franchise fee" means:
(a)  a fee:
(i)  provided for in a franchise agreement; and
(ii)  that is consideration for the franchise agreement; or
(b) (i)  a fee similar to Subsection (2)(a); or
(ii)  any combination of Subsections (2)(a) and (b).
(3) (a)  "Delivered value" means the fair market value of the taxable energy
delivered for sale or use in the municipality and includes:
(i)  the value of the energy itself; and
(ii)  any transportation, freight, customer demand charges, services charges,
or other costs typically incurred in providing taxable energy in usable form
to each class of customer in the municipality.
(b)  "Delivered value" does not include the amount of a tax paid under:
(i)  Title 59, Chapter 12, Part 1, Tax Collection;
(ii)  Title 59, Chapter 12, Part 2, Local Sales and Use Tax Act; or
(iii)  this part.
(4)  "De minimis amount" means an amount of taxable energy that does not
exceed the greater of:
(a)  5% of the energy supplier’s estimated total Utah gross receipts from
sales of property or services; or
(b)  $10,000.
(5)  "Energy supplier" means a person supplying taxable energy, except that
the commission may by rule exclude from this definition a person supplying a
de minimis amount of taxable energy.
(6)  "Franchise agreement" means a franchise or an ordinance, contract, or
agreement granting a franchise.
(7)  "Franchise tax" means:
(a)  a franchise tax;
(b)  a tax similar to a franchise tax; or
(c)  any combination of Subsections (7)(a) and (b).
(8)  "Person" is as defined in Section 59-12-102.
(9)  "Taxable energy" means gas and electricity.
